North Dakota statutes. TITLE 59 Trusts
CHAPTER 59-01 General Provisions [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27]

59-01-01.
Trusts — Classification. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-02.
Express trust — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-03.
Purpose for which express trust may be created. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-04.
Express trust — How created. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-05.
Implied trust — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-06.
Implied trust — How created. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-07.
Trustor, trustee, beneficiary — Definition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-08.
One assuming relation of personal confidence is trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-09.
Good faith required of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-10.
Trustee shall not profit by use of property. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-11.
Transactions adverse to beneficiary prohibited — Exceptions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-12.
Use of influence for own advantage prohibited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-13.
Adverse trust prohibited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-14.
Adverse interest. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-15.
Violation is a fraud against beneficiary. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-16.
Presumption against trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-17.
Liability for mingling property. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-18.
Liability of trustee for unauthorized use of trust property. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-19.
Liability for acts of cotrustees. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-01-20.
Liability of third persons dealing with trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.